Hawaii statutes.
[§328J‑11] Compliance and
administration. (a) Enforcement of compliance with this chapter shall be
under the jurisdiction of the department.

(b) The director shall adopt rules under
chapter 91 as are appropriate to carry out the purposes of this chapter and for
the efficient administration thereof.

(c) Any citizen who wants to register a
complaint under this chapter may initiate an enforcement action with the
department as set forth by the director.

(d) An owner, manager, operator, or employee
of an establishment regulated by this chapter shall inform persons violating
this chapter of its provisions.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of
this chapter, an employee or private citizen may bring legal action to enforce
this chapter.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of
this chapter, the department, other appropriate county agency, county, or any
other person aggrieved by the failure of the owner, operator, manager, or other
person in control of a place open to the public or a place of employment to
comply with this chapter may apply for injunctive relief to enforce this
chapter in any court of competent jurisdiction. [L 2006, c 295, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next